Wisconsin, session 2025, AB784.
do enact as follows:AB784,11Section 1. 15.407 (19) of the statutes is created to read:AB784,2,5215.407 (19) Multifamily housing innovation council. There is created in 3the department of safety and professional services a multifamily housing 4innovation council consisting of the following members appointed by the secretary 5of safety and professional services for 4-year terms:AB784,2,66(a) One member who is a building inspector.AB784,2,87(b) One member who is a professional firefighter and who is recommended by 8Professional Fire Fighters of Wisconsin, Inc., or its successor.AB784,2,109(c) One member who is a fire chief and who is recommended by Wisconsin 10State Fire Chiefs Association, Inc., or its successor.AB784,2,1211(d) One member who is a member of and who is recommended by Wisconsin 12State Fire Inspectors Association or its successor.AB784,2,1413(e) One member who is an automatic fire sprinkler fitter and who is 14recommended by Sprinkler Fitters Local 183 or its successor.AB784,3,21(f) One member who is an engineer and who is recommended by International 2Union of Operating Engineers or its successor.AB784,3,33(g) One member who is an expert on the International Residential Code.AB784,3,54(h) At least one member who is an employee of the department and who has 5expertise with the commercial building code, as defined in s. 101.01 (1g).AB784,26Section 2. 101.02 (7r) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB784,3,107101.02 (7r) (h) Notwithstanding par. (a), a county, city, village, or town may 8enact and enforce an ordinance that allows a multifamily dwelling up to 6 stories to 9be served by a single stairway and that is consistent with the guidebook developed 10under s. 101.024.AB784,311Section 3. 101.024 of the statutes is created to read:AB784,3,1312101.024 Multifamily housing innovation council; duties. (1) The 13multifamily housing innovation council shall do all of the following:AB784,3,2014(a) Develop a guidebook that establishes recommendations for the design and 15construction of a multifamily dwelling that is served by a single stairway. The 16guidebook shall establish building specifications for a single stairway for a 17multifamily dwelling up to 6 stories and shall ensure that such a multifamily 18dwelling is designed and constructed in a manner that is consistent with safe 19occupancy and egress and that meets the standards of the National Fire Protection 20Association.AB784,3,2321(b) Establish a model ordinance and recommendations that will enable a 22county, city, village, or town to allow multifamily housing to be built on land zoned 23for commercial uses.AB784,4,324(c) Make recommendations to the department and the commercial building 1code council regarding any changes to the commercial building code that would 2facilitate multifamily housing innovation recommendations developed by the 3council under this section.AB784,4,84(2) (a) The multifamily housing innovation council shall meet monthly until 5the council completes its work on the guidebook and model ordinance required 6under sub. (1). Thereafter, except as provided in par. (b), the council shall meet 7annually to review and evaluate the guidebook and model ordinance and update 8them as appropriate.AB784,4,119(b) The multifamily housing innovation council shall meet on the call of the 10secretary to develop recommendations regarding any matter related to multifamily 11housing innovation specified by the secretary.AB784,412Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB784,4,1613(1) Staggering of terms. Notwithstanding the length of terms specified for 14the members of the council under s. 15.407 (19), half of the initial members shall be 15appointed for terms expiring on July 1, 2027, and half of the initial members shall 16be appointed for terms expiring on July 1, 2029.AB784,4,1717